Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202513-2009
Director, defined.

Director shall mean the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 9;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 17;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 37.